Iowa, session 2025-2026, HSB282.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 2747YC (5) 91 jda/jh H.F. _____ Section 1. Section 256.11, subsection 10, paragraph c, Code 1 2025, is amended by adding the following new subparagraph: 2 NEW SUBPARAGRAPH . (04) The director shall recommend 3 removal of accreditation of the school district or school to 4 the state board if the department determines that the school 5 district or school violated section 280.36. 6 Sec. 2. Section 256.11, subsection 11, paragraph f, Code 7 2025, is amended to read as follows: 8 f. In the case of a nonpublic school, if the deficiencies 9 have not been corrected, the state board may deaccredit the 10 nonpublic school ; provided, however, that if the deficiencies 11 consist of violations of section 280.36 by the nonpublic 12 school, the state board shall deaccredit the nonpublic school . 13 The deaccreditation shall take effect on the date established 14 by the resolution of the state board, which shall be no later 15 than the end of the school year in which the nonpublic school 16 is deaccredited. 17 Sec. 3. Section 256E.7, subsection 2, Code 2025, is amended 18 by adding the following new paragraph: 19 NEW PARAGRAPH . 0t. Be subject to and comply with the 20 requirements of section 280.36 relating to cooperation with 21 federal immigration and customs enforcement officers in the 22 same manner as a school district. 23 Sec. 4. Section 256E.10, Code 2025, is amended by adding the 24 following new subsection: 25 NEW SUBSECTION . 10A. The state board shall revoke a charter 26 school contract if the state board determines that the charter 27 school violated section 280.36. 28 Sec. 5. Section 256F.4, subsection 2, Code 2025, is amended 29 by adding the following new paragraph: 30 NEW PARAGRAPH . r. Be subject to and comply with the 31 requirements of section 280.36 relating to cooperation with 32 federal immigration and customs enforcement officers in the 33 same manner as a school district. 34 Sec. 6. Section 256F.8, Code 2025, is amended by adding the 35 -1- LSB 2747YC (5) 91 jda/jh 1/ 5 H.F. _____ following new subsection: 1 NEW SUBSECTION . 4A. The state board shall revoke a charter 2 school or innovation zone school contract if the state board 3 determines that the charter school or innovation zone school 4 violated section 280.36. 5 Sec. 7. NEW SECTION . 280.36 Cooperation with federal 6 immigration and customs enforcement officers. 7 1. The board of directors of each school district and the 8 authorities in charge of each accredited nonpublic school 9 shall cooperate with all lawful requests for assistance made 10 by a federal immigration and customs enforcement officer 11 and shall not adopt or enforce a policy or take any other 12 action under which the school district or accredited nonpublic 13 school prohibits or discourages an employee or contractor from 14 assisting or cooperating with a federal immigration and customs 15 enforcement officer if the federal immigration and customs 16 enforcement officer requests assistance or cooperation. 17 2. a. An administrator employed by a school district or 18 an accredited nonpublic school shall cooperate with all lawful 19 requests for assistance made by a federal immigration and 20 customs enforcement officer. 21 b. An administrator employed by a school district or 22 an accredited nonpublic school shall not distribute any 23 communication that indicates the school district or accredited 24 nonpublic school, or an employee of the school district 25 or accredited nonpublic school, will not cooperate with a 26 lawful request for assistance made by a federal immigration 27 and customs enforcement officer, to any of the following 28 individuals: 29 (1) Employees of the school district or accredited 30 nonpublic school. 31 (2) Students enrolled in the school district or accredited 32 nonpublic school. 33 (3) The parent or guardian of a student enrolled in the 34 school district or accredited nonpublic school. 35 -2- LSB 2747YC (5) 91 jda/jh 2/ 5 H.F. _____ c. If the department of education determines that an 1 administrator employed by a school district or an accredited 2 nonpublic school has violated paragraph âaâ or âbâ , all of the 3 following shall apply: 4 (1) The administrator shall be subject to a hearing 5 conducted by the board of educational examiners pursuant 6 to section 256.146, subsection 13, which may result in 7 disciplinary action. 8 (2) The school district or accredited nonpublic school 9 shall place the administrator on administrative leave for one 10 week. 11 d. For purposes of this subsection, âadministratorâ means 12 the same as defined in section 256.145. 13